Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, HB256.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 2111 of the act of March 4, 1971 (P.L.6, No.2), known as the Tax Reform Code of 1971, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 2111. Transfers Not Subject to Tax.--* * *(v) The transfer of ownership of amounts in a qualified tuition program to the designated beneficiary or, in the case of a designated beneficiary who is under 18 years of age, the parent or guardian of the designated beneficiary. For the purposes of this subsection:12345678910111213141516171819202122 (1) The term "qualified tuition program" shall have the same meaning as provided in section 529(b)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.(2) The term "designated beneficiary" shall have the same meaning as provided in section 529(e)(1) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended.Section 2. This act shall apply to estates of decedents dying after November 6, 2023.Section 3. This act shall take effect immediately.20250HB0256PN0202 - 2 - 123456789